Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1209.   Leases.

(1)  As used in this section, "lease" means for a procurement unit to lease or lease-purchase a procurement item from a person.

(2)  This section does not apply to the lease of real property.

(3)  A procurement unit may not lease a procurement item unless the procurement unit complies with the requirements of this section.

(4)  A procurement unit may lease a procurement item if:

(a)  the procurement officer determines that it is in the best interest of the procurement unit to lease the procurement item, after the procurement officer:

(i)  investigates alternative means of obtaining the procurement item; and

(ii)  considers the costs and benefits of the alternative means of obtaining the procurement item;

(b)  all conditions for renewal and cost are included in the lease;

(c)  the lease is awarded through a standard procurement process, or an exception to a standard procurement process described in Part 8, Exceptions to Procurement Requirements;

(d)  for a standard procurement process, the invitation for bids, request for proposals, or request for quotes states:

(i)  that the procurement unit is seeking, or willing to consider, a lease; and

(ii)  for a lease purchase, that the procurement unit is seeking, or willing to consider, a lease-purchase;

(e)  the lease is not used to avoid competition; and

(f)  the lease complies to all other provisions of law or rule applicable to the lease.



Enacted by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

